Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-1206] Personal liability and
penalty. (a) Any general partner who neglects or fails to comply with any
provision of this chapter shall severally forfeit to the State $25 for each
month the neglect or failure continues, to be recovered by action brought in
the name of the State by the director; provided that as to the forfeiture
penalty, the director, for good cause shown, may reduce or waive the penalty.

(b) Any person who signs or certifies as
correct any statement or certificate filed pursuant to this chapter, knowing
the same to be false in any material particular, shall be guilty of a class C
felony.

(c) Any person who negligently, but without
intent to defraud, signs or certifies as correct any statement or certificate,
filed pursuant to this chapter, that is false in any material particular, shall
be punished by a fine not exceeding $500. [L 2006, c 184, §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next